Hawaii, session 2026, SB3272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that more initiatives must be established to address the unmet needs of children and families in the State's child welfare system. The legislature also finds that the malama ohana working group was established within the office of wellness and resilience to seek, design, and recommend transformative changes to the State's existing child welfare system.  In a report submitted to the 2025 legislature, the malama ohana working group recommended establishing preventative programs and comprehensive services to reduce the risk of families entering the child welfare system. The legislature recognizes that other states have successfully reduced the number of families involved in child welfare systems by implementing innovative programs that include assistance with system navigation, financial assistance, and parenting classes and other resources to strengthen families. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the department of human services to establish a five-year child welfare system diversion and intervention pilot program to provide services for families and children involved, or at risk of involvement or reinvolvement, with child welfare services. SECTION 2. (a)  The department of human services shall collaborate with the office of wellness and resilience to design a child welfare system diversion and intervention pilot program.  The department of human services shall implement and administer the pilot program. (b) The pilot program shall provide assistance and services for families and children that are involved, or at risk of involvement or reinvolvement, with child welfare services.  The assistance and services shall include: (1)  Financial assistance and resources to help meet the families' food, clothing, hygiene, housing, parenting, childcare, household, and transportation needs; and (2)  A trauma-informed intervention program to improve caregiver-child relationships and parenting skills through teaching and coaching on positive communication, child behavior management, and calming and emotional regulation strategies for both the caregiver and child. (c) The department of human services, in collaboration with the office of wellness and resilience, shall submit a report of the department's findings and recommendations regarding the child welfare system diversion and intervention pilot program, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2031. (d) The department of human services may contract with public and private entities to design, implement, and administer the pilot program. (e) The pilot program shall cease to exist July 1, 2031. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to design, implement, and administer a child welfare system diversion and intervention pilot program pursuant to this Act, including contracting with public and private entities to provide necessary services. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of human services for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________